Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Flood Control Districts
[Repealed].

§§ 51-35-101 through 51-35-125.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-35-101 through §51-35-105. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4824, 4825, 4769; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 1, 54-58]

§51-35-107. [Codes, 1942, § 4770; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 2; Laws, 1954, ch. 154]

§51-35-109 through §51-25-115. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4771-4774, 4780-4782; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 3-6, 10-12]

§51-35-117. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4775, 4778; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 2, 8; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 217, § 2]

§51-35-119 through §51-35-125. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4776, 4777, 4779, 4782; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 8, 9, 12]

§§ 51-35-127 through 51-35-145.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-35-127 through §51-35-145. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4783-4788, 4796, 4798, 4799; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 13-18, 26-28]

§§ 51-35-147 through 51-35-193.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-35-147 through §51-35-151. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4797, 4801, 4804; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 27, 30, 34]

§51-35-153. [Codes, 1942, § 4789; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 19; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 2]

§51-35-155 through §51-35-159. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4790-4792; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 20-22]

§51-35-161. [Codes, 1942, § 4793; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 23; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 3]

§51-35-163. [Codes, 1942, § 4794; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 24]

§51-35-165. [Codes, 1942, § 4795; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 25]

§51-35-167. [Codes, 1942, § 4800; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 29; Laws, 1946, ch. 217, § 1]

§51-35-169. [Codes, 1942, § 4802; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 31]

§51-35-171. [Codes, 1942, § 4803; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 32; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 4]

§51-35-173. [Codes, 1942, § 4803-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 270, § 4]

§51-35-175. [Codes, 1942, § 4805; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 35]

§51-35-177. [Codes, 1942, § 4806; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 36; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 5; Laws, 1946, ch. 270, § 1]

§51-35-179. [Codes, 1942, § 4807; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 37; Laws, 1946, chs. 270, § 2, 300, § 1]

§51-35-181. [Codes, 1942, § 4808; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 38; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 6; Laws, 1946, chs. 270, § 3, 300, § 2]

§51-35-183. [Codes, 1942, § 4809; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 39; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 7]

§51-35-185 through §51-35-189. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4810-4812; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 40-42]

§51-35-191. [Codes, 1942, § 4813; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 43]

§51-35-193. [Codes, 1942, § 4814; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 44]

§§ 51-35-195 through 51-35-213.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-35-195 through §51-35-207. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4815-4821; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, §§ 45-51]

§51-35-209. [Codes, 1942, § 4823; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 53; Laws, 1938, ch. 343, § 7]

§51-35-211. [Codes, 1942, § 4826; Laws, 1936, ch. 188, § 59]

§51-35-213. [Codes, 1942, § 4826-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 217, § 3]